Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-21] Notice of requisition. (a)
The governor or mayor may requisition and take over any materials, facilities,
or real property or improvements, required for the purposes of this chapter, or
requisition and take over the temporary use thereof. The requisition shall be
made by serving notice upon any person found in occupation of the premises or
having the property in the person's custody, possession, or control; provided
that a like notice shall also be served upon any person who has filed with the
governor or mayor, or with such person as the governor or mayor may designate
for the purpose, a request for notice with respect to the property; provided
further that whenever all persons entitled to compensation for the property
have not been served in the manner aforesaid, the governor or mayor shall
publish a notice of the requisition at the earliest practicable date.

(b) A requisition shall terminate
automatically sixty days after the issuance of a proclamation of a state of
emergency in the State or local state of emergency, respectively, or by a
separate proclamation of the governor or mayor, whichever occurs first. [L
2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next